Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STUDENT CAREER PATHWAYS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin A student career pathways framework is established to improve student access to high-quality, employer-connected career experiences by removing barriers and strengthening coordination among education, workforce, and postsecondary systems. The legislature intends to support local innovation and flexibility in implementing personalized learning plans and career pathway exploration. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Experiential learning" means career-connected learning experiences, including but not limited to work-based learning, internships, job shadowing, industry projects, and other employer-engaged activities aligned to a student's personalized learning plan or academic program. new text end new text begin (c) "Participating school" means a school district or charter school that elects to participate in the voluntary student career pathways framework established under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Student career pathways framework. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of education, in coordination with the commissioners of employment and economic development, labor and industry, and higher education, and in partnership with the P-20 Education Partnership, must establish a statewide framework to support alignment of personalized learning plans, career and technical education, work-based learning, and postsecondary exploration. new text end new text begin (b) Participation in the framework is optional for school districts and charter schools. Nothing in this section creates a mandate or new requirement for schools. new text end new text begin (c) The framework must focus on: new text end new text begin (1) aligning strategies and goals across secondary, postsecondary, and workforce systems related to student career exploration and employer engagement; new text end new text begin (2) supporting coordinated approaches to student career experiences that integrate personalized learning plans, counseling, and career and technical education pathways; new text end new text begin (3) supporting the use of personalized learning plans as a student-centered framework for career exploration, postsecondary planning, and experiential learning, including voluntary guidance that promotes consistency across districts while allowing for local adaptation to community needs; new text end new text begin (4) improving coordination of employer engagement to reduce duplication and increase access to high-quality experiences for students; new text end new text begin (5) encouraging alignment of tools, practices, and data systems, including use of existing systems, to support student transitions from high school to postsecondary education and careers; and new text end new text begin (6) advancing statewide educational attainment goals by supporting student progress toward postsecondary credentials with labor market value, and by encouraging the use of aligned indicators to measure participation, persistence, completion, and transitions across secondary, postsecondary, and workforce systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Commissioner responsibilities. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioners of education, employment and economic development, labor and industry, and higher education must review state statutes, rules, and guidance, as well as state and federal policies and administrative practices related to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and the federal Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act, to identify and remove unnecessary constraints that limit local flexibility to support the student career pathways framework. The commissioners must establish: new text end new text begin (1) clear and coherent career pathway exploration, including strong alignment of career and technical education programs with related postsecondary certificates, diplomas, and degrees; new text end new text begin (2) high-quality, employer-connected experiential learning, including expanded access to work-based learning and other career-connected opportunities for students; and new text end new text begin (3) alignment between secondary and postsecondary programs, enabling smooth student transitions from high school into postsecondary education and training through pathways such as postsecondary enrollment options, concurrent enrollment, dual training, youth skills training, and registered or pre-apprenticeship opportunities. new text end new text begin (b) Using existing resources, the commissioners must issue updated joint guidance to school districts, charter schools, workforce boards, and postsecondary institutions that describes permissible uses of existing federal funds to support the purposes of the student career pathways framework. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Resources. new text end new text begin The commissioners of education, employment and economic development, labor and industry, and higher education must jointly develop and maintain centralized resources, using existing staff and systems to support local implementation, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) planning tools and guidance that strengthen the use of personalized learning plans as a foundation for career exploration and postsecondary readiness, including optional templates that promote consistency while allowing for local adaptation to community needs; new text end new text begin (2) model practices for expanding career exploration and career-connected learning, including strategies for integrating rigorous coursework, dual enrollment, and employer-connected experiences into student planning and personalized learning plans in a manner that aligns with individual goals and local workforce needs; new text end new text begin (3) resources to support equitable access to career-connected learning opportunities, including approaches that help schools expand participation among historically underserved students, including students from low-income families, students of color, and students in rural communities; and new text end new text begin (4) optional tools and templates to support tracking, evaluation, and continuous improvement of student career experiences, including transitions from high school into postsecondary education and training. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2028, the commissioners must submit a joint report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and workforce, labor, and economic development. The report must include information on actions taken to remove state-level barriers, the use of the student career pathway framework by participating schools, and recommendations for further alignment using existing resources. new text end